Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.012

Salaries of judges.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 2025SALARYSCHEDULE.SL) ***

Pursuant to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 2.04.092, 2.06.062, 2.08.092, 3.58.010, and 43.03.310, the annual salaries of the judges of the state shall be as follows:

(1) Effective July 1, 2022:

(a) Chief justice of the supreme court. . . . $227,410

(b) Justices of the supreme court. . . . $224,176

(c) Judges of the court of appeals. . . . $213,400

(d) Judges of the superior court. . . . $203,169

(e) Full-time judges of the district

court. . . . $193,447

(2) Effective July 1, 2023:

(a) Chief justice of the supreme court. . . . $243,329

(b) Justices of the supreme court. . . . $239,868

(c) Judges of the court of appeals. . . . $228,338

(d) Judges of the superior court. . . . $217,391

(e) Full-time judges of the district

court. . . . $206,988

(3) Effective July 1, 2024:

(a) Chief justice of the supreme court. . . . $255,495

(b) Justices of the supreme court. . . . $251,861

(c) Judges of the court of appeals. . . . $239,755

(d) Judges of the superior court. . . . $228,261

(e) Full-time judges of the district

court. . . . $217,337

(4) The salary for a part-time district court judge shall be the proportion of full-time work for which the position is authorized, multiplied by the salary for a full-time district court judge.

[2023 c 1 s 2; 2021 c 1 s 2; 2019 c 5 s 2; 2017 1st sp.s. c 1 s 2; 2015 1st sp.s. c 1 s 2; 2013 c 340 s 2; 2011 c 380 s 2; 2009 c 581 s 2; 2007 c 524 s 2; 2005 c 519 s 2; 2003 1st sp.s. c 1 s 2; 2001 1st sp.s. c 3 s 2; 1999 sp.s. c 3 s 2; 1997 c 458 s 2; 1995 2nd sp.s. c 1 s 2; 1993 sp.s. c 26 s 2; 1991 sp.s. c 1 s 2; 1989 2nd ex.s. c 4 s 2; 1987 1st ex.s. c 1 s 1, part.]